Hawaii statutes.
§122A-7 Discharge; dismissal. (a)
Upon expiration of the term of service for which enlisted or appointed, a
member of the Hawaii state defense force shall be entitled to a discharge;
provided that no member shall be discharged by reason of expiration of term of
service while employed in the active service of the Hawaii state defense force
under section 122A-11.

(b) Subject to rules adopted by the governor,
a member of the Hawaii state defense force may be discharged or dismissed prior
to the expiration of the member's term of service for misconduct, inefficiency,
personal hardship, or such other cause as the governor may prescribe.

(c) No officer shall be dismissed or
discharged under conditions other than honorable, except by sentence of a
court-martial or by order of the governor upon recommendation of a board of
officers.

(d) Subject to rules adopted by the governor,
every discharge of a member of the Hawaii state defense force shall reflect the
character of the member's service. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135,
§1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next